Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 3

Tennessee Water Resources Information Act

69-7-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Water Resources Information Act.”

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 2; T.C.A. §69-8-301.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Water Law, You Never Miss the Water Till the Well Runs Dry (Vincent A. Sikora), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1988).

69-7-302. Legislative intent — System of registration.

The general assembly recognizes that in other states the withdrawal of ground water has caused the lowering of the ground water table and that there is potential for ground water or surface water withdrawals to impact water uses in Tennessee. Therefore, it is necessary and prudent to institute a system of registration so that adequate information is obtained to document current demand for water and to project growth in that demand as applicable to this part.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 3; T.C.A. §69-8-302.

69-7-303. Part definitions. [Current version. See second version of section and its Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of water quality, oil and gas established pursuant to § 69-3-104;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner's duly authorized representative and, in the event of the commissioner's absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner of environment and conservation;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, limited liability company, partnership, association, group, utility district, federal, state or local government agency, or any combination of them;

“Source” means a location where surface or ground water is available, including, but not limited to, a water well, cave, spring, stream, river, lake, or impoundment; and

“Withdraw” means to take water from any source on a regular or recurring basis by means of an intake structure, pipe and pump that diverts water away from a source, or by any other conveyance with or without the use of suction. This does not include nonrecurring withdrawals, including, but not limited to, the filling of a swimming pool from a residential water well or accidental withdrawals caused by failure of pipes or equipment.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 4; T.C.A. §69-8-303.

69-7-303. Part definitions.
[Contingent amendment. See first version of section and Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by § 69-3-104;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation, the commissioner's duly authorized representative and, in the event of the commissioner's absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner of environment and conservation;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, limited liability company, partnership, association, group, utility district, federal, state or local government agency, or any combination of them;

“Source” means a location where surface or ground water is available, including, but not limited to, a water well, cave, spring, stream, river, lake, or impoundment; and

“Withdraw” means to take water from any source on a regular or recurring basis by means of an intake structure, pipe and pump that diverts water away from a source, or by any other conveyance with or without the use of suction. This does not include nonrecurring withdrawals, including, but not limited to, the filling of a swimming pool from a residential water well or accidental withdrawals caused by failure of pipes or equipment.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 4; T.C.A. §69-8-303; Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 39.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104” for “board of water quality, oil and gas established pursuant to §69-3-104” in (1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-7-304. Registration of withdrawal from surface water or groundwater source — Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), no person shall withdraw ten thousand (10,000) or more gallons of water per day from a surface water or a groundwater source unless the withdrawal is currently registered with the commissioner. The commissioner shall accept a recognized method of measuring the quantities of water withdrawn.

Any person who causes such a withdrawal, or proposes such a withdrawal shall annually register such water withdrawal with the commissioner on forms provided for the purpose. For water wells drilled pursuant to § 69-10-101, the initial withdrawal may be registered by the well driller, on behalf of the person causing or proposing the withdrawal, by providing the required information, including an estimate of the withdrawal amount, with the notification of the intent to drill a well and by verifying or modifying, or both, the information when the report of the well driller is delivered to the commissioner. Subsequent withdrawals from water wells shall be registered annually by the person who causes such a withdrawal, or proposes such a withdrawal.

A person may withdraw water for emergencies involving human health and safety without having first registered the withdrawal, provided it is not done on a regular or recurring basis.

A person may withdraw water for agricultural purposes without having registered the withdrawal. If a person withdraws water for agricultural purposes and another purpose, the water used for agriculture shall not count towards the calculation of whether the withdrawal exceeds ten thousand (10,000) gallons per day. For purposes of this part, “agricultural purposes” shall mean use in the production or harvesting of an agricultural product, including, but not limited to, irrigation of crops, nursery stock production as defined at § 43-1-112, and watering of poultry or livestock.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 5; T.C.A. §69-8-304.

69-7-305. Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power to:

Annually collect and compile water quantity data and other quantity information, including data and information on uses of water and well data, and to develop registration and other forms for these purposes. Additionally, if requested and if it is deemed necessary by the commissioner to protect trade secret information as defined in § 47-25-1702, the commissioner shall keep such trade secret information confidential;

Accept forms and data provided by a municipality that has adopted home rule pursuant to article XI, § 9 of the Tennessee Constitution,, or any county operating under a county charter form of government, as part of the annual registration or data collection process, or both;

Pursuant to § 69-7-302, make inspections and investigations, collect samples pursuant to a water quantity inspection or investigation, carry on research, or take such other action as may be necessary to carry out this part, rules and regulations issued pursuant to this part, and any orders that the commissioner may issue;

Enter or authorize the commissioner's agents to enter at all reasonable times upon any property other than dwelling places for the purpose of conducting investigations or studies or enforcing any of the provisions of this part;

Bring suit in the name of the department for any violation of this part, rules and regulations, and orders of the commissioner seeking any remedy provided in this part, rules and regulations and orders of the commissioner, and any other statutory or common law remedy provided in statutory or common law;

Assess civil penalties for violation of any provision of this part or any rule, regulation, standard adopted or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this part;

Issue orders as may be necessary to secure compliance with this part, as well as the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this part; and

Exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this part and all rules and regulations promulgated under this part.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 6; T.C.A. §69-8-305.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

69-7-306. Rules — Rulings in contested cases.

The board has the authority to promulgate the rules, other than rules establishing fees, that it deems reasonable and necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The board has the authority to conduct and make all rulings in contested cases under this part.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 7; T.C.A. §69-8-306.

69-7-307. Violations — Orders — Penalties — Hearings — Injunction.

Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that a person is withdrawing water without having a valid registration, or has supplied false or materially misleading information to the department or has violated any order or rule promulgated pursuant to this part, the commissioner may cause a written administrative order to be delivered to the alleged violator. The order shall specify the provision of this part or rule or order alleged to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof, and may order that corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order, and shall inform the violators of the opportunity for a hearing.

Any such order shall become final and not subject to review unless the person or persons named in the order request by written petition a hearing no later than thirty (30) days after the date such order is delivered; provided, that the board may review such final order on the same grounds upon which a court of the state may review default judgments.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any order issued by or under authority of this part may be served on any person by the commissioner or any person designated by the commissioner, by certified mail, or in accordance with Tennessee statutes authorizing service of process in civil actions.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this part, any order of the commissioner or board issued pursuant to this part or any rule, regulation, or standard adopted pursuant to this part shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per day for each day of violation. Each day such violation continues is a separate violation.

In addition to the commissioner bringing an action in any court of competent jurisdiction, a civil penalty may be assessed in the following manner:

The commissioner may issue an assessment against any person responsible for the violation;

Any person against whom an assessment has been issued may secure a review of such assessment by filing with the commissioner a written petition setting forth the grounds and reasons for the objections and asking for a hearing before the board in the matter involved. If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the assessment is served, the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final;

Whenever any order or assessment has become final because of a person's failure to appeal the commissioner's order or assessment, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of such judgment. The court, in such proceedings, shall treat the failure to appeal such order or assessment as a confession of judgment in the amount of the assessment; and

In assessing a civil penalty, the following factors may be considered:

The harm done or potential for harm to the public health or the environment;

The harm done or potential for harm to the regulatory program by the violation;

The economic benefit gained by the violator;

The amount of effort put forth by the violator to avoid or to remedy the violation; and

Any unusual or extraordinary enforcement costs incurred by the commissioner.

Any hearing or rehearing brought before the board shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner may also initiate an action in any court of competent jurisdiction seeking a judgment for any unpaid penalties.

When there is reason to believe that a person has violated, or is about to violate, any of the provisions of this part or orders issued under this part, the commissioner may institute proceedings in the appropriate court for injunctive relief.

Any person intentionally violating, or failing, neglecting, or refusing to comply with, any of the provisions of this part or rules or regulations commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day upon which such violation occurs is a separate offense.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 8; T.C.A. §69-8-307.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-7-308. Regional water planning — Models — Report.

The commissioner and the board shall encourage and support regional water planning whenever possible. In the future, if there is a specific appropriation of state or federal funds for regional water supply planning, the board may require regional water supply planning and may provide incentives to encourage such regional planning, using the rulemaking authority under this part for so long as such specific appropriation is in effect. Among other criteria, state agencies are authorized to consider regional planning and regionalization efforts when awarding grants, making loans or funding projects.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 9; T.C.A. §69-8-308.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning the deadline for reporting on regional aquifer studies, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

69-7-309. Technical advisory committee.

From time to time, the commissioner may appoint a technical advisory committee that shall advise the commissioner on matters related to the state's water resources. The commissioner may determine the identity and number of committee members and the term during which the committee will operate. The committee may be composed of representatives of federal, state, and local agencies with relevant authority and representatives of appropriate private organizations, including not-for-profit organizations. No member of the committee is entitled to a salary for duties performed as a member of the committee. No member is entitled to reimbursement for travel or other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties.

Acts 2002, ch. 800, § 10; T.C.A. §69-8-309; Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 40.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.